Washington statutes.
RCW 19.52.034

Application of chapter 19.52 RCW to loan or forbearance made outside state.

Whenever a loan or forbearance is made outside Washington state to a person then residing in this state the usury laws found in chapter 19.52 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, shall be applicable in all courts of this state to the same extent such usury laws would be applicable if the loan or forbearance was made in this state.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 23 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—Savings—1967 ex.s. c 23: See notes following RCW 19.52.005.